test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_laavu_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - njäähi: # ok  
    njäähi+N+Sg+Nom:   njäähi
    njäähi+N+Sg+Gen:   njääṿi
    njäähi+N+Sg+Ill:   njááhán
    njäähi+N+Sg+Loc:   njääṿist
    njäähi+N+Sg+Com:   njavvijn
    njäähi+N+Sg+Abe:   njäˊṿittáá
    njäähi+N+Ess:      njäähhin
    njäähi+N+Par:      njäähhid
    njäähi+N+Pl+Nom:   njääṿih
    njäähi+N+Pl+Gen:  [njaaṿij, njaˊṿij]
    njäähi+N+Pl+Acc:   njaaṿijd
    njäähi+N+Pl+Ill:   njavvijd
    njäähi+N+Pl+Loc:   njaaṿijn
    njäähi+N+Pl+Com:   njaˊṿijguin
    njäähi+N+Pl+Abe:   njaˊṿijttáá



  Noun - tiätu: # u-stems - ok
    tiätu+N+Sg+Nom: tiätu
    tiätu+N+Sg+Gen: tiäđu
    tiätu+N+Sg+Acc: tiäđu
    tiätu+N+Sg+Ill: tiätun
    tiätu+N+Sg+Loc: tiäđust
    tiätu+N+Sg+Com: tiäđoin
    tiätu+N+Sg+Abe: tiäˊđuttáá
    tiätu+N+Ess: tiättun
    tiätu+N+Par: tiättud
    tiätu+N+Pl+Nom: tiäđuh
    tiätu+N+Pl+Gen: [tiäđui, tiäˊđui]
    tiätu+N+Pl+Acc: tiäđuid
    tiätu+N+Pl+Ill: tiäđoid
    tiätu+N+Pl+Loc: tiäđuin
    tiätu+N+Pl+Com: tiäˊđuiguin
    tiätu+N+Pl+Abe: tiäˊđuittáá


  Noun - máksu+v2: # ok; SgCom + PlIll cehcked with Ilmari Mattus; IM: vs; MLO: vss; both are in use LAAVU
    máksu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  máksu
    máksu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  máávsu
    máksu+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  máávsu
    máksu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  mááksun
    máksu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  máávsust
    máksu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  mávssoin
    máksu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  máˊvsuttáá
    máksu+v2+N+Ess:  máksun
    máksu+v2+N+Par:  máksud
    máksu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  máávsuh
    máksu+v2+N+Pl+Gen: [máávsui, máˊvsui]
    máksu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  máávsuid
    máksu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  mávssoid
    máksu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  máávsuin
    máksu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  máˊvsuiguin
    máksu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  máˊvsuittáá
